Illinois, session 104th, HB4262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protecting Children from Hidden Cameras Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Child" means an unemancipated individual who is less than 818 years of age.9    "Consent" means affirmative, conscious, and voluntary 10authorization by an individual with legal capacity to give 11authorization.12    "Hidden camera" means a miniature or disguised recording 13device that can record or film a person while that person has 14no awareness that the device is present or being used.15    "Hotel" means any building or buildings in which the 16public may, for a consideration, obtain living quarters, 17sleeping accommodations, or housekeeping accommodations. The 18term includes inns, motels, tourist homes or courts, lodging 19houses, rooming houses, apartment houses, retreat centers, 20conference centers, hunting lodges, and short-term rentals.21    "Hotel guest accommodations" means living quarters, 22sleeping accommodations, housekeeping accommodations, or 23private rooms or suites rented or occupied by a guest within a   HB4262 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16636 JRC 30039 b1hotel, motel, or similar establishment that are intended for 2the private use of guests. The term includes restrooms located 3within or serving those accommodations. The term does not 4include stairwells, corridors, laundry facilities, employee 5areas, or other areas open to the general public in which there 6is no reasonable expectation of privacy.7    "Live video" means any real time or contemporaneous 8electronic or digital transmission of a still or moving visual 9image.10    "Residence" includes a rental dwelling, but does not 11include stairwells, corridors, laundry facilities, or 12additional areas in which the general public has access.13    "Video record" means any videotape, photograph, film, or 14other electronic or digital recording of a still or moving 15visual image. 16    Section 10. Civil action.17    (a) A cause of action is created for a child or the parent 18or guardian of the child on behalf of the child if a person or 19entity knowingly makes or transmits a video record of the 20child using a concealed or disguised recording device, or 21otherwise in a manner intended to avoid detection, without the 22consent of the child's parent or guardian in any of the 23following locations:24        (1) A restroom, tanning bed, tanning salon, locker 25    room, changing room, or hotel guest accommodations.  HB4262 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16636 JRC 30039 b1        (2) A residence in which the child does not reside, in 2    an area or place within that residence in which a person 3    would reasonably expect privacy.4    (b) This Section does not apply to any of the following:5        (1) A parent or legal guardian of the child who is the 6    subject of the recording unless the parent's or legal 7    guardian's action is prohibited by a law other than this 8    Act.9        (2) A recording made by law enforcement in the lawful 10    performance of official duties.11        (3) A recording made in good faith in the reporting of 12    unlawful conduct. 13    Section 15. Violation of Act is per se harmful. A child who 14proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant 15violated this Act against the child is considered obviously 16and materially harmful to the child and is deemed to be per se 17harmful and traumatic. A child does not need to present 18additional evidence to prove the child was harmed, but the 19child may present additional evidence to show the extent of 20the harm. Nothing in this Section may be construed to state 21that a child discovered the cause of action at any particular 22time, or that a child realized that the child's damages were 23related to the violation of this Act at any particular time. 24    Section 20. Privacy of children.  HB4262 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16636 JRC 30039 b1    (a) In an action under this Act:2        (1) a plaintiff may proceed by using a pseudonym in 3    place of the true name of the plaintiff under Section 4    2-401 of the Code of Civil Procedure; and5        (2) the court may exclude or redact from all pleadings 6    and documents filed in the action other identifying 7    characteristics of the plaintiff.8    (b) If a plaintiff uses a pseudonym as provided in this 9Section, the plaintiff must file with the court and serve on 10the defendant a confidential information form that includes 11the excluded or redacted plaintiff's name and other 12identifying characteristics.13    (c) The court may make further orders as necessary to 14protect the identity and privacy of a plaintiff.15    (d) If a plaintiff is granted privacy protections under 16this Section, a defendant may file a motion with the court to 17receive the same privacy protections. The court may deny or 18grant the motion at its discretion. 19    Section 25. Remedies.20    (a) In an action under this Act, a prevailing plaintiff 21may recover:22        (1) economic and noneconomic damages proximately 23    caused by the defendant's violation of this Act, 24    including, but not limited to, damages for emotional 25    distress whether or not accompanied by other damages;  HB4262 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16636 JRC 30039 b1        (2) punitive damages; and2        (3) reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the 3    prevailing plaintiff.4    (b) This Act does not affect or limit a right or remedy 5available under any other law of this State. 6    Section 30. Statute of limitations.7    (a) An action under this Act may not be brought later than 82 years from the date the cause of action was discovered or 9should have been discovered with the exercise of reasonable 10diligence.11    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), this 12Section is subject to the tolling statutes of this State.13    (c) If a cause of action accrues for a violation of this 14Act against a child, the time specified in subsection (a) of 15this Section does not begin to run until the child becomes 16emancipated or attains the age of majority. 17    Section 35. Inspections for hidden cameras. If a State 18agency or unit of local government is required by law or 19ordinance to inspect a restroom, tanning bed, tanning salon, 20locker room, changing room, or hotel guest accommodations, the 21State agency or unit of local government must also inspect for 22hidden cameras.23    If a hidden camera is discovered during an inspection 24conducted by a State agency or unit of local government, the   HB4262 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 16636 JRC 30039 b1State agency or unit of local government must immediately 2notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.3    If a hidden camera is discovered outside of an inspection 4conducted by a State agency or unit of local government, the 5person or entity discovering the device must immediately 6notify the appropriate law enforcement agency and preserve any 7reasonably available evidence relating to the device until 8collected by law enforcement or otherwise directed by law 9enforcement. 10    Section 97. Applicability. This Act applies to causes of 11action accruing on or after the effective date of this Act. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.